South Dakota, session 2026, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-21-1.2 be AMENDED:
10-21-1.2. For purposes of chapters 10-21 to 10-26, inclusive, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Courthouse," the county courthouse, the administrative building where the county
office of treasurer is located, or a building where the board of county
commissioners meet;
(2) "QR code", a quick response code taking the form of a two-dimensional matrix
barcode intended to be digitally scanned; and
(3) "Treasurer," the county treasurer.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-21:
The property tax bill sent to each taxpayer pursuant to § 10-21-1.1 must include
a QR code and an internet address, connecting the taxpayer to a website maintained by
the Department of Revenue which provides supplementary information on property
taxation, and on property tax relief programs, in this state.
The tax bill must provide notice to the taxpayer that further tax information may
be found by using the QR code and the internet address.

26.146.31 2 1258
An Act to require that a property tax bill provide access to a state website providing property
tax information.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1258
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1258 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1258 ENROLLED